Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8605
Commission; director; employees.

(1) The commission shall employ a director who is the administrative officer of the commission. The director shall hire employees as necessary for the efficient operation of the commission. The director shall serve at the pleasure of the commission.

(2) The commission shall have power in each instance (a) to establish standards of qualification for personnel employed pursuant to the Commission for the Blind and Visually Impaired Act and (b) to employ necessary field agents, teachers, and other personnel in accordance with such standards and fix their compensation. All employees of the commission, except the director, shall be included within the State Personnel System.

Laws 1917, c. 233, § 3, p. 571;

C.S.1922, § 6876;

C.S.1929, § 83-313;

R.S.1943, § 83-211;

Laws 1947, c. 332, § 3, p. 1050;

Laws 1976, LB 674, § 6;

Laws 1988, LB 810, § 1;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 934;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 83-211;

Laws 2000, LB 352, § 5.